Maryland, session 2025, HB0374.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Correctional Services
3–702.
(a) Subject to subsections (b) [and], (c), AND (D) of this section, § 3–711 of this
subtitle, and Title 7, Subtitle 5 of this article, an incarcerated individual committed to the
custody of the Commissioner is entitled to a diminution of the incarcerated individual’s
term of confinement as provided under this subtitle.
(b) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, an incarcerated individual
who is serving a sentence for a violation of § 3–303 or § 3–304 of the Criminal Law Article
involving a victim who is a child under the age of 16 years, or an incarcerated individual
who is serving a sentence for a violation of § 3–305 or § 3–306 of the Criminal Law Article,
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0374*

HOUSE BILL 374
as the sections existed before October 1, 2017, involving a victim who is a child under the
age of 16 years, is not entitled to a diminution of the incarcerated individual’s term of
confinement as provided under this subtitle.
(2) An incarcerated individual who is serving a sentence for a violation of
§ 3–303 of the Criminal Law Article that occurred on or after October 1, 2024, is not entitled
to a diminution of the incarcerated individual’s term of confinement as provided under this
subtitle.
(c) An incarcerated individual who is serving a sentence for a violation of § 3–307
of the Criminal Law Article involving a victim who is a child under the age of 16 years is
not entitled to a diminution of the incarcerated individual’s term of confinement as provided
under this subtitle, if the incarcerated individual was previously convicted of a violation of
§ 3–307 of the Criminal Law Article involving a victim who is a child under the age of 16
years.
(D) AN INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL WHO IS SERVING A SENTENCE FOR A
VIOLATION OF § 2–201 OF THE CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE THAT OCCURRED ON OR
AFTER OCTOBER 1, 2025, IS NOT ENTITLED TO A DIMINUTION OF THE
INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL’S TERM OF CONFINEMENT AS PROVIDED UNDER THIS
SUBTITLE.
11–502.
(a) Except as provided in subsections (b) [and], (c), AND (D) of this section, an
incarcerated individual who has been sentenced to a term of imprisonment shall be allowed
deductions from the incarcerated individual’s term of confinement as provided under this
subtitle for any period of presentence or postsentence confinement in a local correctional
facility.
(b) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, an incarcerated individual
who is serving a sentence for a violation of § 3–303 or § 3–304 of the Criminal Law Article
involving a victim who is a child under the age of 16 years, or an incarcerated individual
who is serving a sentence for a violation of § 3–305 or § 3–306 of the Criminal Law Article,
as the sections existed before October 1, 2017, involving a victim who is a child under the
age of 16 years, may not be allowed deductions from the incarcerated individual’s term of
confinement as provided under this subtitle for any period of presentence or postsentence
confinement in a local correctional facility.
(2) An incarcerated individual who is serving a sentence for a violation of
§ 3–303 of the Criminal Law Article that occurred on or after October 1, 2024, may not be
allowed deductions from the incarcerated individual’s term of confinement as provided
under this subtitle for any period of presentence or postsentence confinement in a local
correctional facility.

HOUSE BILL 374 3
(3) This subsection may not be construed to require an incarcerated
individual to serve a longer sentence of confinement than is authorized by the statute under
which the incarcerated individual was convicted.
(c) (1) An incarcerated individual who is serving a sentence for a violation of
§ 3–307 of the Criminal Law Article involving a victim who is a child under the age of 16
years, who has previously been convicted of violating § 3–307 of the Criminal Law Article
involving a victim who is a child under the age of 16 years, may not be allowed deductions
from the incarcerated individual’s term of confinement as provided under this subtitle for
any period of presentence or postsentence confinement in a local correctional facility.
(2) This subsection may not be construed to require an incarcerated
individual to serve a longer sentence of confinement than is authorized by the statute under
which the incarcerated individual was convicted.
(D) AN INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL WHO IS SERVING A SENTENCE FOR A
VIOLATION OF § 2–201 OF THE CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE THAT OCCURRED ON OR
AFTER OCTOBER 1, 2025, IS NOT ENTITLED TO A DIMINUTION OF THE
INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL’S TERM OF CONFINEMENT AS PROVIDED UNDER THIS
SUBTITLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.